Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1886.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part IX of Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 99BAG USAGESec.9901. Scope of chapter.9902. Definitions.9903. Bag alternative.§ 9901. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to alternatives to single-use plastic bags and to the use of compliant bags.§ 9902. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Compliant bag." Any of the following:(1) A paper bag that:(i) Is 100% recyclable overall.(ii) Contains a minimum of 40% postconsumer recycled material.(iii) Can be composted.(iv) Displays the words "recyclable" or "reusable" in a visible manner on the outside of the paper bag.(2) A bag that:(i) Has handles made of cloth or other washable fabric, or which is otherwise durable.(ii) Is specifically designed and manufactured for multiple uses.(iii) Is 100% recyclable overall."Customer." A person purchasing goods from a retail establishment."Retail establishment." As follows:(1) A business entity that sells or otherwise distributes goods directly to a customer, regardless of whether the sale or distribution is carried on for profit.(2) The term includes a retail store, restaurant, pharmacy, convenience store, grocery store, liquor store, seasonal or temporary business or similar entity or facility."Single-use plastic bag." As follows:(1) A bag made predominantly of plastic derived from petroleum or a biologically based source, such as corn or another plant source, which is provided by a retail 20250HB1886PN2347 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment to a customer at the point of sale or distribution.(2) The term includes a compostable and biodegradable bag.(3) The term does not include a reusable bag, produce bag, product bag or any of the following that is used for carry-out purpose or otherwise:(i) A bag provided by a retail establishment and used by a customer inside the retail establishment to do any of the following:(A) Package bulk items, such as fruit, vegetables, nuts, grains, candies or small hardware items.(B) Contain or wrap frozen foods, meat or fish, whether packaged or not.(C) Contain or wrap flowers, potted plants or other items if dampness may be an issue.(D) Contain unwrapped prepared foods or bakery goods.(ii) A pharmacy prescription bag.(iii) A newspaper bag.(iv) A door-hanger bag.(v) A laundry or dry cleaning bag.(vi) A bag sold in a package containing multiple bags intended for use as a food storage bag, garbage bag, yard waste bag or pet waste bag.§ 9903. Bag alternative.A retail establishment that has banned the use or provision of single-use plastic bags shall provide compliant bags to customers at the point of sale or distribution, free of charge.20250HB1886PN2347 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1886PN2347 - 4 - 1